Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3319
Legal service insurance corporation; advancement of funds; repayment.

Any person may advance to a corporation organized under sections 44-3312 and 44-3313 on a contingent liability basis such funds as are necessary for the purposes of its business or to enable it to comply with any requirements of sections 44-3301 to 44-3327. Such money and interest thereon as may have been agreed upon shall be repayable and shall be repaid only on prior approval by the director. Repayment shall only be made out of operating surplus after reserve requirements have been met. No assessments against insureds may be levied for the purpose of repayment and no dividends may be paid to members as long as interest or repayment installments remain unpaid.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 19.